Georgia statutes. TITLE 25 Fire Protection and Safety
CHAPTER 4 Firefighter Standards and Training
25-4-9.
Basic firefighter training course; transfer of certification.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, full-time, and part-time firefighters, including airport firefighters, shall successfully complete a basic training course. The council shall determine the course content, number of hours, and all other matters relative to basic firefighter training, including airport rescue firefighter training for full-time and part-time firefighters. Upon satisfactory completion of such basic training, a firefighter shall be issued a certificate of completion evidencing the same. Each firefighter shall be required to successfully complete such basic training course within 12 months after being employed or appointed as a firefighter or, in the case of airport firefighters, within such time period as the council may prescribe by rule or regulation.

The volunteer council shall determine the course content, number of hours, and all other matters relative to basic firefighter training for volunteer firefighters. Each volunteer firefighter shall be required to complete such basic training course within 18 months after being appointed as volunteer firefighter.

Each firefighter who presents to the council, or to the volunteer council in the case of volunteer firefighters, satisfactory documentation, as determined by the council or volunteer council, of his or her training as a member of the United States armed forces, the Georgia National Guard, or the Georgia Air National Guard shall be issued a certificate of completion by the council or volunteer council.

A firefighter certified by the council may, upon termination of employment from any fire department and upon agreement with a subsequently employing fire department, transfer such certification to the employing fire department.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section, any local fire department may refuse to accept the transfer of previously acquired certification and may require any newly employed firefighter to complete the basic training course provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 693, § 8; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1493, § 4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 660, § 4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1259, § 11; Ga. L. 2003, p. 888, § 8; Ga. L. 2005, p. 619, § 3/SB 308; Ga. L. 2018, p. 202, § 2/HB 699; Ga. L. 2020, p. 515, § 12/SB 342.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, designated the existing provisions of subsection (a) as paragraph (a)(1); substituted “Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, full-time,” for “Full-time,” at the beginning of paragraph (a)(1); and added paragraph (a)(2).

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, designated the existing provisions of paragraph (a)(1) as subparagraph (a)(1)(A); in subparagraph (a)(1)(A), substituted “and part-time firefighters” for “part-time, and volunteer firefighters” in the first sentence, and added “for full-time and part-time firefighters” at the end of the second sentence; added subparagraph (a)(1)(B); and, in paragraph (a)(2), inserted “, or to the volunteer council in the case of volunteer firefighters,” and “or volunteer council” twice.

25-4-10.
Mandatory training.

As a condition of continued certification, all full-time and part-time firefighters shall train, drill, or study at schools, classes, or courses at the local, area, or state level, as specified by the council. Authorized leaves of absence are expected.

As a condition of continued certification, all volunteer firefighters shall train, drill, or study at schools, classes, or courses at the local, area, or state level, as specified by the volunteer council. Authorized leaves of absence are expected.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 693, § 11; Ga. L. 2003, p. 888, § 9; Ga. L. 2020, p. 515, § 13/SB 342.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a); inserted “full-time and part-time” in the first sentence of subsection (a); and added subsection (b).

25-4-11.
Adoption of higher training requirements by employing agencies.

This chapter shall provide only the minimum qualification standards in training requirements for firefighters in this state and does not restrict any employing agency from setting and establishing requirements that exceed these minimum standards.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 693, § 9.

25-4-11.1.
Testing for illegal drug usage in firefighters; requirements.

All firefighters qualified based upon successful completion of training set forth in subparagraph (a)(2)(A) of Code Section 25-4-8 shall be subject to random testing for evidence of use of illegal drugs. Such testing shall occur at least biannually for the first two years of licensure or certification. Such testing shall be noninvasive and may be conducted at any time during the calendar year, and the cost of all such testing shall be borne by the employer. If the drug test shows the presence of drugs in the firefighter’s system, the results of the test will be confirmed with an alternative method by using the same urine sample.

The council shall adopt rules and regulations for purposes of testing and retesting for illegal drugs, including:

Which illegal drugs will be the subject of testing;

Methods for ensuring minimal privacy intrusions during collection of body fluid specimens for such testing;

Methods for ensuring proper storage, transportation, and handling of such specimens in order to maintain the integrity of the testing process;

Which persons should be entitled to the results of such tests and which methods should be used for ensuring that only authorized persons are given access to such results;

A list of laboratories qualified to conduct established drug tests; and

Procedures through which firefighters, prior to the collection of body fluid specimens for such testing, may provide information to their employers regarding use of any drug pursuant to a medical prescription or, as otherwise authorized by law, any substance which could affect the results of such test.

Any rules or regulations adopted pursuant to this Code section shall be in compliance with Parts 40 and 382 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-4-11.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2021, p. 782, § 2/SB 46.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 10, 2021.

25-4-12.
Applicability of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall apply to firefighters employed on July 1, 1971, and such firefighters are not required to meet the requirements of Code Section 25-4-8 or Code Section 25-4-9 as a condition of tenure or continued employment; nor shall their failure to fulfill such requirements make them ineligible for any promotional examination for which they are otherwise eligible, affect in any way any pension rights to which they are otherwise eligible, or affect in any way pension rights to which they may be entitled on July 1, 1971. The council shall have the authority to investigate qualifications of, and in its discretion to issue certificates to, those previously trained firefighters employed on July 1, 1971.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 693, § 10; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 25/HB 497.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Nothing in this chapter” for “Except as otherwise provided in Article 2, nothing in this chapter” at the beginning of this Code section.

25-4-30 and 25-4-31.
[Repealed]

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2005, p. 619, § 4/SB 308, effective July 1, 2005.